Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Part 5. Shell Canal

§ 41-2-219.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 99-99-219 by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 401.

§ 41-2-220.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 99-99-220 by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 401.

§ 41-2-221.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 99-99-221 by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 401.

§ 41-2-222.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 99-99-222 by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 401.